Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.53.090

Acquisition of control of state trust company—Notice and application—Registration statement—Violations—Penalties.

(1) An acquiring person shall not acquire control of a state trust company until thirty days after filing with the director a written notice of and application for change of control containing the following information, plus any additional information that the director may prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the particular instance for the protection of shareholders, trustors, beneficiaries, and the public interest:

(a) The identity and trust and other business experience of each acquiring person by whom or on whose behalf acquisition is to be made, including the identity and experience of:

(i) The officers, managers, and directors of the acquiring person; and

(ii) Any proposed new officers, managers, or directors for the state trust company in the event of a change of control of the state trust company;

(b) The financial and managerial resources and future prospects of each person involved in the acquisition;

(c) The terms and conditions of any proposed acquisition and the manner in which the acquisition is to be made;

(d) The source and amount of the funds or other consideration used or to be used in making the acquisition, and a description of the transaction and the names of the parties if any portion of these funds or other consideration has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition;

(e) Any plan or proposal which any person making the acquisition may have to liquidate the state trust company, to sell its assets, to merge it with another trust institution, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure for management;

(f) The identification of any person employed, retained, or to be compensated by the acquiring person, or by any person on its behalf, who makes solicitations or recommendations to shareholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition and a brief description of the terms of the employment, retainer, or arrangement for compensation; and

(g) Copies of all invitations for tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to shareholders for the purchase of their shares to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition.

(2) When an entity is required to file an application under this section, the director may require that information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), and (f) of this section be given for each officer, manager, and director of such entity, and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the entity.

(3) If any tender offer, request, or invitation for tenders or other agreements to acquire control is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the securities act of 1933, 48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 77(a), as amended, or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the securities exchange act of 1934, 48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 78(a), as amended, the registration statement or application may be filed with the director in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(4) Any acquiring person shall also deliver a copy of any notice and application required by this section to the state trust company proposed to be acquired within two days after the notice and application is filed with the director.

(5) Any acquisition of control in violation of this section shall be ineffective and void.

(6) Any person who willfully or intentionally violates this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Each day's violation shall be considered a separate violation, and any person shall upon conviction be fined not more than one thousand dollars for each day the violation continues.

[ 2019 c 389 s 94.]